Washington statutes.
RCW 36.165.110

Privately financed debt not enforceable by county.

A county may not enforce any privately financed debt under this chapter. Neither the state nor any county may use public funds to fund or repay any loan between a capital provider and property owner. No section under this chapter shall be interpreted to pledge, offer, or encumber the full faith and credit of a local government, nor shall any local government pledge, offer, or encumber its full faith and credit for any lien amount through a program.

[ 2020 c 27 s 13.]